Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.325

Statewide electronic repository for school meals.

Household income information received by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, school district employees, or designees of either in accordance with the electronic repository established under RCW 28A.235.285 is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 111 s 2.]